Connecticut, session 2026, HB05201.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to appropriate one hundred
fifty thousand dollars to the Department of Developmental Services to
acquire software licenses to share with local and regional boards of
education for the purpose of increasing transition services to students
as part of Project SEARCH administered by the department.